Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 62.1-44.5.
(For expiration date — see notes) Prohibition of waste discharges or other quality alterations of state waters except as authorized by permit; notification required.

Except in compliance with a certificate or permit issued by the Board or other entity authorized by the Board to issue a certificate or permit pursuant to this chapter, it shall be unlawful for any person to:

Discharge into state waters sewage, industrial wastes, other wastes, or any noxious or deleterious substances;

Excavate in a wetland;

Otherwise alter the physical, chemical or biological properties of state waters and make them detrimental to the public health, or to animal or aquatic life, or to the uses of such waters for domestic or industrial consumption, or for recreation, or for other uses; or

On and after October 1, 2001, conduct the following activities in a wetland:

New activities to cause draining that significantly alters or degrades existing wetland acreage or functions;

Filling or dumping;

Permanent flooding or impounding; or

New activities that cause significant alteration or degradation of existing wetland acreage or functions.

Any person in violation of the provisions of subsection A who discharges or causes or allows (i) a discharge of sewage, industrial waste, other wastes or any noxious or deleterious substance into or upon state waters or (ii) a discharge that may reasonably be expected to enter state waters shall, upon learning of the discharge, promptly notify, but in no case later than 24 hours the Board, the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, or the coordinator of emergency services appointed pursuant to § 44-146.19 for the political subdivision reasonably expected to be affected by the discharge. Written notice to the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall follow initial notice within the time frame specified by the federal Clean Water Act.

5.

Discharge stormwater into state waters from Municipal Separate Storm Sewer Systems or land disturbing activities.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-17; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 1990, c. 717; 1996, c. 119; 2000, cc. 1032, 1054; 2001, cc. 354, 383; 2004, c. 372; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.5

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2000, cc. 1032 and
1054, cl. 2, as amended by Acts
2001, cc. 435 and
464, cls. 1 and 2, provide: “That the State Water Control Board shall promulgate regulations governing excavation activities in wetlands to be effective within 280 days of enactment of this act and shall adopt proposed regulations to implement all other provision(s) of this act by January 1, 2001, to become effective on October 1, 2001; provided however, and notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, including
§§

62.1-44.5

,

62.1-44.15

, and

62.1-44.15:5

, that the proposed amendment to the State Water Control Board’s regulations 9 VAC 25-210 et seq. and 9 VAC 25-680 et seq., acted upon by the Board on December 13, 2000, shall, when promulgated as final regulations upon completion of the regulatory process established by the Administrative Process Act ( § 9-6.14:1 et seq. [now
§

2.2-4000

et seq.]) become effective on August 1, 2001, with respect to linear transportation projects of the Virginia Department of Transportation.”

Acts
2000, cc. 1032 and
1054, cl. 3 provides: “That the State Water Control Board shall promptly, but no later than July 1, 2002, seek from the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers the issuance to Virginia of a § 404 Clean Water Act State Programmatic General Permit. The Board shall report to the House Committee on Chesapeake and Its Tributaries and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources at least every six months on its progress in obtaining the State Programmatic General Permit.”

Acts
2000, cc. 1032 and
1054, cl. 4 provides: “That nothing in this act shall be construed to restrict the State Water Control Board’s authority to issue Virginia Water Protection Permits for activities requiring certification under § 401 of the Clean Water Act.”

Acts
2004, c. 372, which added subdivision A 5, in cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment clause including the provisions that transfer the responsibility for administering the issuance of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges from MS4 and construction activities shall become effective on January 1, 2005, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever is the latter.” The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency approved the transfer of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board in a letter dated December 30, 2004.

Acts
2004, c. 372, cl. 4 provides: “That the Department of Conservation and Recreation shall on or after July 1, 2004, seek authorization for delegation of program authority for the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board for the issuance of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges from MS4 and construction activities from the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency under the federal Clean Water Act. Such permits issued by the State Water Control Board that have not expired or been revoked or terminated before or on the program transfer date shall continue to remain in effect until their specified expiration dates.”

Acts
2004, c. 372, cl. 5 provides: “That the Virginia Stormwater Management Act regulations (4 VAC 3-20 et. seq.) shall be transferred from the Board of Conservation and Recreation to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board on July 1, 2004 and the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board may amend, modify, or delete provisions in the these regulations in order to implement this Act. Such regulations that are in effect shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended, or rescinded by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board.”

Acts
2004, c. 372, cl. 6 provides: “That the Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (VPDES) General Permit Regulation For Discharges of Storm Water From Construction Activities,
9 VAC 25-180-10 et seq., and the General Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (VPDES) Permit Regulation For Discharges Of Storm Water From Small Municipal Separate Storm Sewer Systems,
9 VAC 25-750-10 et seq., are hereby transferred from the State Water Control Board to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board as set forth in the third enactment clause and shall remain in full force and effect until amended, modified, or repealed by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board. Those amendments to the regulations necessitated by this act shall be exempt from Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act. Any future amendments shall be adopted in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act.”

Acts
2004, c. 372, cl. 7 provides: “That the relevant provisions of Fees For Permits And Certificates Regulations,
9 VAC 25-20-10 et seq., and the Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (VPDES) Permit Regulations,
9 VAC 25-31-10 et seq., and other necessary regulations pertaining to the administration and implementation of an NPDES permit program associated with MS4 or construction activity stormwater discharge programs as adopted by the State Water Control Board shall be vested with and remain in full force and effect for the State Water Control Board and also shall be hereby transferred to and be in full force and effect for the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board on the effective date as set forth in the third enactment clause, as identical regulations until amended, modified, or repealed by the individual actions of the Virginia Water Control Board or the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to reflect each board’s authorities as authorized by this act. Those amendments necessitated by this act shall be exempt from Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.”

Acts
2004, c. 372, cl. 8 provides: “That the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, on or after July 1, 2004, shall have authority to transfer relevant provisions in the existing regulations of the State Water Control Board and program administration provisions that may be required by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency into the Virginia Stormwater Management Act regulations (4 VAC 3-20 et. seq.). These actions shall be exempt from Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act. Such amendments shall be effective no earlier than the effective date as set forth in the third enactment clause.”

Acts
2004, c. 372, cl. 9 provides: “That on or after July 1, 2004, the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board may amend, modify, or delete provisions in the existing Virginia Stormwater Management Act regulations (4 VAC 3-20 et. seq.) including but not limited to those pertaining to the standards and procedures for delegating authority for administering a stormwater management program to localities. Such amendments shall be effective no earlier than the effective date as set forth in the third enactment clause.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 1032 and 1054 are identical, and in subsection A, redesignated former clauses (i) and (ii) as present subdivisions A 1 and A 3, and added subdivisions A 2 and A 4.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by cc. 354 and 383 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “in violation of the provisions of subsection A” for “required to obtain a permit or certificate pursuant to this chapter,” and deleted “in violation of the provisions of subsection A” following “(ii) a discharge that may reasonably be expected to enter state waters.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 372 added subdivision A 5.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 756 and 793 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “or permit” and “or other entity authorized by the Board to issue a certificate or permit pursuant to this chapter” in the introductory language, and deleted “unless in compliance with a permit issued pursuant to Article 1.1 (§ 10.1-603.1 et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 10.1” at the end of subdivision A 5.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1603 (1970).

For article assessing the adequacy of Virginia’s water policy, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 312 (1972).

For article on stream flow maintenance in Virginia, see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 485 (1984).

For comment, “The Inconsistency of Virginia’s Execution of the NPDES Permit Program: The Foreclosure of Citizen Attorneys General from State and Federal Courts,” see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 715 (1995).

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).

For article, “Environmental Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 601 (2001).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

20 M.J. Waters and Watercourses, § 24.

§ 62.1-44.5.
(For effective date — see notes) Prohibition of waste discharges or other quality alterations of state waters except as authorized by permit; notification required.

Except in compliance with a certificate, land-disturbance approval, or permit issued by the Board or other entity authorized by the Board to issue a certificate, land-disturbance approval, or permit pursuant to this chapter, it shall be unlawful for any person to:

Discharge into state waters sewage, industrial wastes, other wastes, or any noxious or deleterious substances;

Excavate in a wetland;

Otherwise alter the physical, chemical, or biological properties of state waters and make them detrimental to the public health, or to animal or aquatic life, or to the uses of such waters for domestic or industrial consumption, or for recreation, or for other uses;

On and after October 1, 2001, conduct the following activities in a wetland:

New activities to cause draining that significantly alters or degrades existing wetland acreage or functions;

Filling or dumping;

Permanent flooding or impounding; or

New activities that cause significant alteration or degradation of existing wetland acreage or functions; or

Any person in violation of the provisions of subsection A who discharges or causes or allows (i) a discharge of sewage, industrial waste, other wastes, or any noxious or deleterious substance into or upon state waters or (ii) a discharge that may reasonably be expected to enter state waters shall, upon learning of the discharge, promptly notify, but in no case later than 24 hours the Board, the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, or the coordinator of emergency services appointed pursuant to § 44-146.19 for the political subdivision reasonably expected to be affected by the discharge. Written notice to the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall follow initial notice within the time frame specified by the federal Clean Water Act.

5.

Discharge stormwater into state waters from Municipal Separate Storm Sewer Systems or land disturbing activities.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-17; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 1990, c. 717; 1996, c. 119; 2000, cc. 1032, 1054; 2001, cc. 354, 383; 2004, c. 372; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.5

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and in subsection A, twice inserted “land-disturbance approval”; in subdivision A 3, deleted “or” from the end of the subdivision; in subdivision A 4 d, added “or” at the end. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.6.
Chapter supplementary to existing laws.

This chapter is intended to supplement existing laws and no part thereof shall be construed to repeal any existing laws specifically enacted for the protection of health or the protection of fish, shellfish and game of the Commonwealth, except that the administration of any such laws pertaining to the pollution of state waters, as herein defined, shall be in accord with the purpose of this chapter and general policies adopted by the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-18; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638.

§ 62.1-44.6:1.
Permit rationale.

In granting a permit pursuant to this chapter, the Department shall provide in writing a clear and concise statement of the legal basis, scientific rationale, and justification for the decision reached. When the decision of the Department is to deny a permit pursuant to this chapter, the Department shall, in consultation with legal counsel, provide a clear and concise statement explaining the reason for the denial, the scientific justification for the same, and how the Department’s decision is in compliance with applicable laws and regulations. Copies of the decision, certified by the Director, shall be mailed by certified mail to the permittee or applicant.

History.

2022, c. 356.